Utah statutes.
75-5-411.   Bond.
Subject to the provisions of Title 7 relating to the bonding requirements for
corporate fiduciaries, the court shall require a conservator to furnish a bond
conditioned upon faithful discharge of all duties of the trust according to
law, with sureties as it shall specify, unless the court dispenses with such
bond for good cause shown. Unless otherwise directed, the bond shall be in the
amount of the aggregate capital value of the property of the estate in his
control plus one year's estimated income minus the value of securities and
cash deposited under arrangements requiring an order of the court for their
removal and the value of any land which the fiduciary, by express limitation
of power, lacks power to sell or convey without court authorization. The
court, in lieu of sureties on a bond, may accept other security for the
performance of the bond, including a pledge of securities or a mortgage of
land.
